Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,131
Examinations; requirements; grades.

(1) Examinations approved by the board may be national standardized examinations, but in all cases the examinations shall be related to the knowledge and skills necessary to perform the practices being examined and shall be related to the curricula required to be taught in nail technology programs.

(2) In order to successfully complete the examination, an applicant shall obtain an average grade of seventy-five percent on the written examination.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 35;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,187;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 393;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 47.